Utah statutes.
76-8-509.   Extortion or bribery to dismiss criminal proceeding.

(1) A person is guilty of a felony of the second degree if by the use of force or by any threat which would constitute a means of committing the crime of theft by extortion under this code, if the threat were employed to obtain property, or by promise of any reward or pecuniary benefits, he attempts to induce an alleged victim of a crime to secure the dismissal of or to prevent the filing of a criminal complaint, indictment, or information.

(2)  "Victim," as used in this section, includes a child or other person under the care or custody of a parent or guardian.



Enacted by Chapter 196, 1973 General Session

